


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Real Estate Fund (TRREX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Real Estate Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				TRREX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/24/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$28.35
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							-$0.05
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/24/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								0.61%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$26.76
							
							-
							
								$31.13
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$6,225.29

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall





3 Year





5 Year





10 Year







				Morningstar rated the Real Estate Fund among 
232,
232,
203
and 
142
Real Estate
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to provide long-term growth through a combination of capital appreciation and current income.
		
Average Annual Total Returns 2



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					-2.60%
				
			

				
					-2.60%
				
			


3 Years

				
					7.23%
				
			

				
					7.23%
				
			


5 Years

				
					8.66%
				
			

				
					8.66%
				
			


10 Years

				
					5.37%
				
			

				
					5.37%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 9.80%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							9.80%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							October 31, 1997
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.74%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.74%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   								
			


				The Real Estate Fund charges a 1% 
redemption fee on shares held 90 days or less. 
The performance information shown does not reflect the deduction of the redemption fee; 
if it did, the performance would be lower.
			


2
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Mon Jul 24 23:21:36 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund





















404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                












Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now





































Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















85% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 6/30/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Personal Finance





Summer 2017 Issue: T. Rowe Price Report

July 20, 2017









Personal Finance





Top 10 Financial To-Dos for Recent College Grads

July 19, 2017









Fixed Income





Finding Opportunities in High Yield Markets

July 18, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 6/30/17, 72 of 108 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*157 of our 332 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 134 of these 157 (85%) funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 215 of 317 (68%), 183 of 225 (81%), 149 of 180 (83%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
36 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes). 34 of these 36 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 38 of 39, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 162 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 6/30/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari













































RealtyMogul.com™ | Real Estate Crowdfunding & Investing





Skip to main content








Real Estate Crowdfunding









Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 












Commercial Real Estate Investing for AllTM








                125,000 Investors
              

                Have joined RealtyMogul.com.
              

                Have joined Us.
              





                Over $285 Million
              

                Invested on our platform.
              

                Invested with us.
              





                $65 Million
              

                Paid out to RealtyMogul.com investors.
              

                Paid out to investors.
              





                $0 Principal Lost
              

                By RealtyMogul.com investors.
              

                By investors.
              






 



 















"Realty Mogul has so far raised more than $200 million to finance more than 330 properties since its launch in 2013."
  



"RealtyMogul.com's purpose is 'access through innovation' with investor protection and compliance as our guiding principles."
  



"... appeals to all skill levels, from first-timers to veteran investors. In just a few clicks, investors can access the best real estate deals."
  





 






How It Works


1. Invest
Invest in crowdfunded commercial real estate opportunities online for as little as $1000.


2. Relax
We collect returns generated from your investment and pay any expenses.


3. Get Paid
You reap the rewards when we distribute the income from your investments.


Get Started For FREENeed Financing? 








Investments on RealtyMogul.com are illiquid and loss of invested capital is possible. 
Please review risk factors for private placements here.
 







Recent Investments



 





        $3,510,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Retail
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Prunedale
        


  

 





        $1,010,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Industrial
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Indianapolis
        


  

 





        $1,240,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Multifamily
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Marietta
        


  

 





        $2,040,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Office
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Chicago
        


  

 





        $2,190,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Office
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            San Antonio
        


  

 





        $2,020,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Multifamily
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Oak Harbor
        


  

 





        $1,515,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Multifamily
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Fayetteville
        


  

 





        $710,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Office
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Hollywood
        


  

 





        $1,210,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Industrial
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Houston
        


  

 





        $1,525,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Office
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Rolling Meadows
        


  



























 
 








Become a Commercial Real Estate Investor Today
Join Now For FREE 



 



 
 




 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software


















































































Get Real Estate Financing | RealtyMogul.com





Skip to main content














Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 

 









Get Financing



How much are you looking to finance? 

 Debt or Equity?DebtEquity




 

 
 







Looking to Invest?
Start Here
 







Joint Venture Equity
$1MM - $5MM




Equity Contribution:
Up to 90% of equity


IRR:
13% +


Term:
1 - 10 years


Timing:
Close in 35 - 45 days


Structure:
Single consolidate entity: one K-1, one distribution, one report




Raise J.V. Equity for My Project
Learn More




Preferred Equity
$1MM - $5MM




Pref. Equity Contribution:
Up to 85% of cost


Rate:
11 - 13%


Term:
1 - 10 years


Timing:
Close in 35 - 45 days


Structure:
Single consolidate entity: one K-1, one distribution, one report




Raise Pref. Equity for My Project
Learn More




Commercial Bridge Loans
$1MM - $25MM




Loan to Cost:
Up to 85%


Loan to Value:
Up to 75%


Rate:
5 - 10%


Term:
12 - 36 Months


Timing:
Close in 35 - 45 days


Type:
Recourse and Non-Recourse




Finance My Commercial Project
Learn More




Mezzanine Debt
$1MM - $5MM




Mezzanine Contribution:
Up to 80%


Rate:
10 - 12%


Term:
1 - 10 years


Timing:
35 - 45 days




Finance My Commercial Project
Learn More


 




Looking to Invest?
Start Here 




More than $285 Million Financed to Date for 350+ Properties
 




Selected Transactions




$3,510,000
Equity Purchase
Prunedale, CA
Safeway & CVS Retail Center





$2,100,000
Commercial Loan
Bel Air, CA
5 Unit Multifamily




Finance My Next Project

 




Real Estate Lending Simplified.
Start Here 



Featured Articles




   
 RealtyMogul.com Named a Top Tech Company to Work For - Top Tech Company to Work For

In a recent Built in Los Angeles article...  

   
 News Recap: Largest Real Estate Loan Funded... - Largest Real Estate Loan Funded

Just in case you missed it, here’s a...  

   
 What Do Investors Need to Know About Crowdfunding?  - Crowdfunding

Featured in Bisnow.com

Crowdfunding platforms have...  

   
 RealtyMogul.com’s Newly Redesigned About Us Page  - About Us

If you’ve never read about how RealtyMogul.com came to be,...  

   
 CEO Jilliene Helman Featured on ABC15 Arizona - Jilliene Helman recently discussed her role as CEO and founder of...  

 

 
 

 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software












































































Register | RealtyMogul.com





Skip to main content














Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 

 









Invest



WelcomeGet started by creating your account below.Already have a RealtyMogul.com account? Log In Leave this field blank 


 This account is for *
  Investing 

  Raising Capital 





SMS Consent (Optional)By checking this box, you are consenting to participate in RealtyMogul.com's SMS Communications Program with the phone number entered above. By participating, you consent to receive text messages sent by an automatic telephone dialing system and acknowledge that data usage charges may apply by your cell phone company.Messages will include notifications regarding your RealtyMogul.com account, investment opportunity updates, and occasional special offers and promotions from RealtyMogul.com. These can be configured at any time in your user profile. First name *


 Last name *


 Phone *


 E-mail *


 Password *


 Acceptance of Terms *

I reviewed and agree to Terms of Service and Privacy Policy. *

 Communication Preferences 

I agree to receive SMS messages. (Optional)













 

 
 




 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software



















































































Register | RealtyMogul.com





Skip to main content














Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 

 









Invest



WelcomeGet started by creating your account below.Already have a RealtyMogul.com account? Log In Leave this field blank 


 This account is for *
  Investing 

  Raising Capital 





SMS Consent (Optional)By checking this box, you are consenting to participate in RealtyMogul.com's SMS Communications Program with the phone number entered above. By participating, you consent to receive text messages sent by an automatic telephone dialing system and acknowledge that data usage charges may apply by your cell phone company.Messages will include notifications regarding your RealtyMogul.com account, investment opportunity updates, and occasional special offers and promotions from RealtyMogul.com. These can be configured at any time in your user profile. First name *


 Last name *


 Phone *


 E-mail *


 Password *


 Acceptance of Terms *

I reviewed and agree to Terms of Service and Privacy Policy. *

 Communication Preferences 

I agree to receive SMS messages. (Optional)













 

 
 




 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software



















































































Register | RealtyMogul.com





Skip to main content














Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 

 









Invest



WelcomeGet started by creating your account below.Already have a RealtyMogul.com account? Log In Leave this field blank 


 This account is for *
  Investing 

  Raising Capital 





SMS Consent (Optional)By checking this box, you are consenting to participate in RealtyMogul.com's SMS Communications Program with the phone number entered above. By participating, you consent to receive text messages sent by an automatic telephone dialing system and acknowledge that data usage charges may apply by your cell phone company.Messages will include notifications regarding your RealtyMogul.com account, investment opportunity updates, and occasional special offers and promotions from RealtyMogul.com. These can be configured at any time in your user profile. First name *


 Last name *


 Phone *


 E-mail *


 Password *


 Acceptance of Terms *

I reviewed and agree to Terms of Service and Privacy Policy. *

 Communication Preferences 

I agree to receive SMS messages. (Optional)













 

 
 




 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software

























































L&B REAL ESTATE OPPORTUNITY FUND LP Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      L&B REAL ESTATE OPPORTUNITY FUND LP
                    

•   STAMFORD, CT
                          • Hedge Fund
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             L&B Real Estate Opportunity Fund is based out of Stamford.    The firm last filed a Form D notice of exempt offering of securities on 2016-11-28. The filing was for a pooled investment fund:  hedge fund The notice  included securities offered of Pooled Investment Fund Interests,Other
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)
Form D 2



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from L&B REAL ESTATE OPPORTUNITY FUND LP, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




l&b real estate opportunity fund lp


C/O LAND &AMP; BUILDING INVEST. MGMT LLC

STAMFORD
CT
                                                        
                                                    06901


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      203-987-6427







Recent SEC Filings




D/A filed on 11/28/2016
D filed on 10/08/2015
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...



Form D Filings

  Form D is a form to be used to file a notice of an exempt offering of securities with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
  Form D contains basic information about the offering and the company.


Form D Filings


Filing Date
Form Type
Industry Group
Securities Offered
Total Offering Amount
Total Amount Sold
Total Remaining




2016-11-28
D/A
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  HEDGE FUND

      Pooled Investment Fund Interests,Other
    
INDEFINITE
50,000,000
INDEFINITE


2015-10-08
D
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  HEDGE FUND

      Pooled Investment Fund Interests,Other
    
INDEFINITE
35,000,000
INDEFINITE




Other Issuers in Filings


Name
Address





  No Other Issuers
  




Related Parties included in filings


Name
Address
Relationship




(GENERAL PARTNER)   LAND  BUILDINGS GP LP

          subscription required
    


          DIRECTOR
          PROMOTER
      



(INVESTMENT MANAGER)   LAND  BUILDINGS INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT, LLC

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
          PROMOTER
      



JONATHAN   LITT

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      











Elevate your investments
Try it for free




























 







L&B Real Estate Opportunity Fund LP - Pooled Investment Fund- Land & Buildings Gp Lp  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









L&B Real Estate Opportunity Fund LP

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    C/O Land & Building Invest. Mgmt Llc 1 Landmark Square 7 Th Floor 
    Stamford, CT, 06901Phone: 203-987-6427 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2016-11-28


Amended


$50,000,000


$15,000,000


Other


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link




	2015-10-08


New


$35,000,000


$35,000,000


Other


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 (General Partner) Land & Buildings Gp Lp 
 Director, Promoter 


 (Investment Manager) Land & Buildings Investment Management, Llc 
 Executive, Promoter 


 Jonathan Litt 
 Executive 
















VIA Folio - Canna Real Estate Fund, LP








Canna Real Estate Fund, LP









Company
Canna Real Estate Fund, LP (the "Fund") was launched to provide capital and liquidity to state-legal cannabis businesses that are excluded from traditional sources of financing and capital markets due to current federal prohibitions against cannabis. Through long-term triple net ("NNN") leases, the Fund plans to monetize real estate for such companies, enabling them to fund their operations and expansions for activities that are legal under state legislation.
The Fund provides accredited investors with an opportunity to gain exposure to the rapidly evolving and expanding state-legal cannabis industry, which now includes 28 states plus the District of Columbia as of the November 2016 election cycle. The Fund’s General Partner believes that the Fund could provide diversification to investment portfolios through exposure to a new asset class.
The General Partner is composed of individuals with extensive experience in real estate investment and management, with its headquarters in New York.
Investment Offering 
This is a cumulative preferred stock offering in which the Fund offers investors 100% of net cash flow until they receive an annual non-compounding preferred return of 10%, and 90% of cash flow until they receive an annual cumulative non-compounding preferred return of 14%. Please see the private placement memorandum ("PPM") for projections and accompanying risk factors.




Details

Total issue: $30 million
Minimum investment: $50,000
Placement Agent: VIA Folio
Available to accredited investors only

Offering Documents

   Canna Real Estate Fund Private Placement Memorandum 
   Canna Real Estate Fund Executive Summary 


Subscribe 
	
There are significant  risks investing in private securities. VIA Folio is only available to U.S. citizens and
  permanent residents. Some offerings require you to be an accredited investor in order to participate.
 Already a Folio Investing customer?
 Simply login to your account and click the Private Investing icon  at the top of the page.
  Login

 



 Financial Advisors 


If you are not a client of Folio Institutional and/or if you are a client and do not have access to “Private Investing” on folioInstitutional.com,
email support@viafolio.com or call (888) 485-3456.


To view and subscribe to current offers, login to folioInstitutional.com and click on any client account for which you have either trader or
account manager access. Select “Offerings” under the words “Private Investing” on the right side of the page.









Legal
Risks
Important Disclosures
Privacy & Security
Financial Statement



Contact
info@viafolio.com
(888) 485-3456







Address
VIA Folio
8180 Greensboro Drive
8th Floor
McLean, VA 22102




















Investment Strategies | Siguler Guff & Company, LP
























Skip to main content












Investor Access







About UsFirm History

Investment ServicesInvestment Strategies
Responsible Investing

Our Team
News
Careers
Contact Us
Investor Access















Investment Strategies




Since inception, Siguler Guff has managed over $15 billion of investor commitments, of which over $3 billion have been in separate accounts and other advisory activities.
 








Distressed, Special Situations and Specialty Finance










Distressed Opportunities Funds




Investor Commitments: $5.3 billion 



Siguler Guff’s Distressed Opportunities Funds are diversified portfolios that invest in the securities and other interests of companies, structures or assets undergoing financial distress, operating difficulties or restructuring. The portfolios use an active management, broad-based approach and include corporate debt and equity, structured credit, real estate, other special situations and niche opportunities, as well as secondary investments. The Firm takes a dynamic approach, looking across geographies, asset classes and strategies to tactically allocate capital to investments appropriate to the market opportunity and cycle. Siguler Guff actively reevaluates market conditions to target market inefficiencies and dislocations in value which are inherently limited in time. The strategy is implemented through a variety of fund structures, separate accounts, joint ventures, secondary transactions, and direct investments / co-investments.
 













Trade Finance Opportunities Fund




Investor Commitments: $263 million 



Through the Distressed Opportunities Funds, Siguler Guff identified a unique opportunity to take advantage of the disconnect between mandatory new capital charges for trade finance assets and low expected losses. Siguler Guff’s Trade Finance Opportunities Fund seeks to structure and enter into separate accounts or joint ventures with operating partners to negotiate investments primarily in trade finance regulatory capital relief transactions and to own, hold, sell or otherwise dispose of such investments.
 













Secondary Opportunities Fund




Investor Commitments: $337 million 



Siguler Guff has been investing in the secondary market since 2010 through its distressed investment platform. The Firm focuses on special situations/credit-focused secondary market opportunities including purchasing interests in funds managed by traditional distressed managers and out-of-favor managers/fallen angels, side pocket liquidations, and value and yield-oriented strategies.
 





 

 



Real Estate








Investor Commitments: $1.8 billion 



Siguler Guff’s Distressed Real Estate Opportunities Funds are diversified portfolios that invest in various types of real property interests, including equity interests in commercial property, commercial mortgages and commercial mortgage-backed securities, and the debt and equity securities of real estate operating companies and real estate investment trusts. The portfolios target high quality properties, primarily in the U.S. and Europe, which have deteriorated in value due to high levels of vacancy and deferred maintenance issues resulting from overleveraged capital structures. Siguler Guff employs a value-oriented, cycle-aware and structure-agnostic strategy to target the evolving opportunity in the current cycle. The Firm seeks to create a program with access to a broad universe of value opportunities at lower fees and with better governance than the traditional opportunity fund or fund-of-fund models, through greater control and alignment of managers.
Siguler Guff’s real estate experience dates back to 1993 when the Firm, in partnership with a leading small business lender, formed Business Mortgage Investors, Inc. in the wake of the Savings and Loan Crisis to purchase performing small business mortgages from the Resolution Trust Company and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

 



 

 



Small Business








Investor Commitments: $1.7 billion 



Siguler Guff’s Small Buyout Opportunities Funds are diversified portfolios that invest in small buyout funds (funds capitalized with less than $250 million) and small-lower middle market companies (companies with $3-$15 million of EBITDA) which are difficult for many investors to access. The program targets specialized, small, yet well-established, companies that are typically family-owned, founder-owned and/or owner-operated. Siguler Guff believes that the small and lower middle market offers inefficiencies and a variety of appealing characteristics, including substantial deal flow, less competitive transactions, lower purchase multiples, low leverage and significant value creation potential. To effectively and efficiently target this segment of the market, Siguler Guff works with small buyout fund managers as both a limited partner and a co-investment partner. The Firm seeks to partner with managers who have reliably demonstrated the ability to acquire high-quality companies at purchase price and leverage multiples below prevailing market multiples, stemming from their ability to source robust deal flow and exert a disciplined investment style.

 



 

 



Emerging Markets










BRIC Opportunities Funds and Emerging Markets Separate Accounts




Investor Commitments: $2.6 billion 



Siguler Guff’s BRIC Opportunities Funds are diversified portfolios that selectively invest in the rapidly growing economies of Brazil, Russia, India and China, and other emerging markets with attractive private equity characteristics. The Firm targets small and medium-sized businesses that benefit from the expanding middle class, growth of local industries and growth in per capita GDP of these emerging economies. Siguler Guff partners with local teams who are capable of sourcing attractively priced, high-growth companies in non-competitive processes and who focus on fast growing Tier II and Tier III cities and regions.
 













Russia Partners Funds




Investor Commitments:  $1.3 billion 



Operating since 1991, Russia Partners is a leading private equity investor in Russia and the countries of the former Soviet Union. Russia Partners has managed six private equity funds and more than 65 investments. The core investment strategy of Russia Partners is to make direct equity and equity-related investments in fast-growing medium-sized companies operating in industries that meet the developing demands of the region’s rapidly growing and maturing middle class. Russia Partners’ founding partners have worked together for over 20 years, investing in the region through numerous economic cycles, including the economic crises of 1998 and 2008.
 













RP Tech




Investor Commitments: $93 million 



RP Tech was established in 2011 to make direct equity and equity-related investments in high-growth businesses in areas related to technology and innovation in Russia and the countries of the former Soviet Union, as well as in companies that are implementing global technologies and processes throughout this region. Notable investments made by RP Tech include GlobalLogic, a full-lifecycle product development services leader, Viagogo, a leading European online ticket marketplace, Mirantis, a leading pure-play OpenStack software company, and RetailNext, the worldwide market leader for in-store retail analytics.
Click here to visit the Russia Partners website
 





 

 



Separate Accounts








Investor Commitments: $2.8 billion 



Siguler Guff recognizes the need for certain clients to maintain a unique degree of focus and diversification within their private equity portfolios, and consequently works with select clients to provide customized solutions through separate accounts. The Firm currently manages separate accounts with aggregate investor commitments of approximately $2.8 billion on behalf of clients such as public and corporate pension funds, sovereign wealth funds, unions, endowments, foundations and superannuation funds.
Siguler Guff began managing its first separate account in 1993 and has prudently increased the number of separate accounts that it manages over time. These portfolios include a range of investment strategies such as buyouts, growth capital, distressed and special situations, venture capital, mezzanine, real estate, and secondary investments that invest globally across North America, Europe, and the emerging markets. Siguler Guff’s separate account mandates typically include direct investments / co-investments as well as underlying fund investments and leverage resources across the Firm to manage customized portfolios for investors.
As an advisor, Siguler Guff evaluates the global private equity market, assesses the best investment opportunities in the market at any given point in time and provides specific advice on sectors of particular interest to its clients. Siguler Guff provides extensive due diligence and a comprehensive evaluation of fund managers and direct investments / co-investments in these sectors. The Firm manages all transactions (investor capital calls and distributions) and provides consolidated, customized client reports and portfolio analysis. Siguler Guff also advocates on behalf of its clients through advisory board participation and active management of underlying investments.
 



 

 



Advisory Activities and Other Strategies










Venture Lending & Leasing




Investor Commitments: $374 million 



Venture Lending & Leasing was formed as a joint venture between Siguler Guff Advisers and Western Technology Investments in 1994. Siguler Guff served as a co-adviser to the first three Venture Lending & Leasing funds. Starting with Venture Lending & Leasing IV, Siguler Guff's role transitioned to that of a special limited partner.
The Venture Lending & Leasing funds were organized to provide asset-backed financing to carefully selected venture capital-backed companies in the form of secured loans and equipment leases and in exchange for current coupon payments and equity warrants. Loans to each company range from $1 million to $25 million, with warrant coverage of 7% to 12% of the loan amount. Venture Lending & Leasing provides an alternative, carefully structured layer of financing that complements venture capital equity. 
 













Siguler Guff Capital Partners




Investor Commitments: $265 million 



Established in 1999, Siguler Guff Capital Partners is a unique program in which Siguler Guff co-invests with investors in top-quality, best of breed private equity funds, both domestically and internationally, across a range of opportunities including buyouts, venture capital, distressed, mezzanine financing, and special situations/turnarounds. The Firm identifies, evaluates, and accesses these unique private equity opportunities and allows each investor in the Siguler Guff Capital Partners program to decide on a case-by-case basis whether to participate. In most cases, access to these top-tier private equity firms and investment minimums would otherwise be prohibitive to smaller investors.
 













WMAM Funds




Investor Commitments: $529 million 



In April 2009, Siguler Guff became the investment adviser to the WMAM funds, a portfolio of four multi-manager funds and one direct investment fund that were part of a joint venture between BNY Mellon and WestLB.
 





 

 

 



Note: Investor commitments for Siguler Guff’s dedicated emerging markets and small business separate accounts are included in the Separate Accounts section and also in the respective strategy section.




















L&B Realty Advisors, LLP – Client Focused. Performance Driven.










































 Client Focused. Performance Driven.






















L&B Realty Advisors is an employee-owned, SEC-registered real estate investment advisor. Since 1965, L&B has provided real estate investment management services to institutional investors and family offices. With $8 billion under management and over 50 years experience, L&B has a proven track record of successfully acquiring, managing, and disposing real estate on behalf of our clients.
































Funds - Starwood Capital


















Funds - Starwood Capital











































The Atlantic, AtlantaOwned by Starwood Opportunity Fund VIII and Corus Co-Invest








Facts At A Glance




Number ofOpportunisticReal Estate FundsLaunched





Size of Firm'sLargest Fund(SOF X)










UPB Value ofNon-PerformingLoans AcquiredVia Last Three Funds





Capital RaisedFor Firm'sInaugural Fundsin 1991









Walker Tower, New YorkOwned by Starwood Opportunity Fund VIII





Helsfyr Atrium, OsloOwned by Starwood Global Opportunity Fund X





Perimeter One, Raleigh, NCOwned by Starwood Global Opportunity Fund X





Mammoth Mountain Ski Resort, Mammoth Lakes, CAOwned by Starwood Opportunity Fund VII












						Funds					


Opportunistic


Hotel


Debt










Our funds generally take an opportunistic approach to global real estate investing. While operating amid widely disparate economic environments over the past 25 years, our funds have shared a focus on acquiring assets with strong potential fundamentals at a significant discount to replacement cost.




Opportunistic
STARWOOD GLOBAL OPPORTUNITY FUND X (SOF X)
Starwood Capital closed its 10th global opportunistic real estate fund in March 2015, with capital commitments from more than 100 investors globally totaling $5.6 billion—the Firm’s largest fund to date. SOF X continues the successful approach of its predecessor funds, with a focus on acquiring, developing and repositioning high-quality assets in nearly every major real estate asset class with strong fundamentals. At the same time, the Fund seeks investments that can generate consistent and growing cash-on-cash returns either sourced directly, in partnerships, or joint ventures. The major change with SOF X’s investment strategy is an increased focus on Europe, as we expect a growing number of opportunities to emerge from the region. Leveraging its robust pipeline, Starwood Capital through SOF X is well-positioned to invest opportunistically in compelling properties around the world, while continuing to be patient and thus avoid rushing to compete for overpriced transactions.
Starwood Distressed Opportunity Fund IX (SOF IX)
Starwood Capital closed its ninth global opportunistic real estate fund in April 2013, with $4.2 billion of total capital commitments from more than 100 investors around the world. The portfolio is diversified by both geography and product type, and has been constructed to focus on strong cash returns during the investment period. SOF IX has continued the successful strategy of predecessor fund SOF VIII, but with an increased focus on Europe. The Fund’s primary investment themes are centered on distressed debt (loan-to-own), value-add income assets (inflation hedge), corporate transactions and land/development opportunities.
Starwood Global Opportunity Fund VIII (SOF VIII)
Starwood Capital closed its eighth global opportunistic real estate fund in March 2010, with total equity commitments of $1.83 billion. Due to global uncertainty and volatility during our investment period, we focused on “margin of safety.” One clear measure of this approach is overall leverage that is extremely low for any type of fund, but especially for a real estate opportunity fund. We also sought investments that provided downside protection, asymmetric risk/reward profiles and hedges against inflation. The Fund pursued five major investment themes: land/residential, value-add income assets, distressed debt, corporate transactions and global hospitality. Our transaction sourcing is a key advantage for the Firm—and the vast majority of SOF VIII was sourced off-market in noncompetitive, privately negotiated transactions or through the bankruptcy process.
Starwood Global Opportunity Fund VII (SOF VII)
Starwood Capital closed its seventh global opportunistic fund in December 2005, with total equity commitments of $1.48 billion. SOF VII sought to construct a diversified portfolio by investing in undervalued real estate and real estate-related assets and operating companies globally across all property types, including hotel and leisure, multifamily and residential, office, senior housing and mixed-use developments. In numerous cases, we pursued a strategy that leveraged our best-in-class asset management team to invest capital and create incremental value within the properties.
Starwood Global Opportunity Fund VI (SOF VI)
Starwood Capital closed its sixth global opportunistic fund in February 2002, with total equity commitments of $567 million. SOF VI targeted both corporate opportunities and a variety of niche strategies. The Firm utilized its strong joint-venture platforms to expand its international investments in France, the U.K. and Germany, and to grow its senior housing and residential land investments in the U.S. We also combined the discipline of fundamental real estate investing with our knowledge of operating businesses to pursue compelling investments in the hotel and golf sectors.
Starwood Global Opportunity Fund V (SOF V)
Starwood Capital closed its fifth global opportunistic fund in April 1999, with total equity commitments of $516 million. We pursued a diversified strategy with an emphasis on the residential and retail markets, and constructed and/or redeveloped condominium projects in major cities. We also formed a series of joint ventures to acquire and redevelop retail properties. SOF V also featured the Firm’s first investment in the senior housing sector. A major initiative was the formation of investment platforms in Asia and Europe. With these efforts, Starwood Capital established a global presence that continues to expand to this day.
Starwood Opportunity Fund IV (SOF IV)
Starwood Capital closed its fourth global opportunistic fund in February 1997, with total equity commitments of $830 million. Our goal with the Fund was to combine Starwood Capital’s successful equity investment strategies with its expertise in high-yielding mezzanine investments. The result was a balanced portfolio with investments across mezzanine debt, hotel debt, mixed-use complexes, residential land development, retail and leisure-related assets. In March 1998, the Firm contributed SOF IV’s debt investments, combined with those of Starwood Mezzanine, to form iStar Financial, Inc., providing investors with increased liquidity in one of the nation’s leading commercial real estate finance companies.
Starwood Opportunity Fund II (SOF II)
Starwood Capital closed its second fund in November 1993, with $102 million of equity commitments. Utilizing its growing local partner network, the Firm sought to capitalize on opportunities resulting from distressed sellers, over-leveraged or mismanaged assets and the shortage of entrepreneurial capital in the market. The diversified portfolio consisted of hotel, office, land and multifamily assets across the United States. All of these investments were purchased at substantial discounts to replacement cost.
Starwood Opportunity Funds I and IA (SOF I)
Starwood Capital created its first opportunity funds in February 1991 and March 1993, respectively, with $52 million of equity commitments, to take advantage of capital dislocations in the real estate markets. After extensive bottom-up research, the Firm focused on acquiring multifamily units in domestic markets with improving fundamentals and limited competition. Starwood Capital purchased approximately 6,400 multifamily properties through an aggressive acquisition program that included equity and distressed debt from the Resolution Trust Corp., FDIC, savings & loan associations, over-leveraged partnerships and tax-exempt bondholders. Just 18 months after their organization, the Funds contributed the majority of their multifamily portfolio to an operating partnership controlled by Equity Residential Properties Trust (NYSE: EQR), a newly formed real estate investment trust, in exchange for operating partnership units convertible to shares of EQR stock. EQR went on to become the largest publicly traded apartment owner in the country. This transaction marked the first of numerous leading real estate platforms or companies that Starwood Capital would help create throughout its history.


Hotel
Starwood Capital Global Hospitality Fund II (Hotel II)
Starwood Capital closed its second dedicated hospitality fund in March 2010, with total equity commitments of $965 million. Utilizing low leverage, Hotel II focused on four core investment themes: superior cash flow-generating assets, major rebranding/repositioning opportunities, iconic assets and development/redevelopment opportunities in New York City, one of the nation’s strongest hotel markets. Nearly 90% of investments were sourced in noncompetitive, privately negotiated transactions or through the bankruptcy process—and most were purchased at prices significantly below replacement cost.
Starwood Capital Global Hospitality Fund I (Hotel I)
Following Barry Sternlicht’s departure from Starwood Hotels & Resorts, Starwood Capital raised its first dedicated hospitality fund in November 2005, with total equity commitments of $900 million. Through Hotel I, Starwood Capital continued its acquisition program in the hotel and leisure sector, with investments in luxury and budget hotels, extended-stay hotels, resorts, restaurants, leisure/entertainment properties, and island and hotel development opportunities.


Debt
Starwood Debt Fund II (Debt II)
Starwood Capital closed its second debt fund in January 2009, with total equity commitments of $378 million. Operating amid an exceedingly challenging recessionary environment, Debt II sought to capitalize on dislocations in the U.S. and global credit markets. The Fund focused on a full range of performing debt investments, including first mortgages, junior notes, commercial mortgage-backed securities, corporate bonds and mezzanine debt.
Starwood Mezzanine Investors (Starwood Mezzanine)
Convinced that equity pricing of real estate markets was reaching full value, we were one of the first equity investment firms to shift into the mezzanine market. We closed our third fund in November 1994, with total equity commitments of $220 million. The goal of the Fund was to create a portfolio of high-yielding mezzanine investments with significant current cash flow and positions in the capital structure that were at substantial discounts to replacement cost. Starwood Mezzanine invested across a range of multifamily, hotel, resort, office and land development assets. As a result, Starwood Capital attained a leading position in the developing mezzanine market by combining the Firm’s underwriting strength with its ability to creatively structure custom-tailored financing.












 




Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Real Estate Fund (TRREX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Real Estate Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				TRREX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/24/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$28.35
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							-$0.05
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/24/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								0.61%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$26.76
							
							-
							
								$31.13
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$6,225.29

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall





3 Year





5 Year





10 Year







				Morningstar rated the Real Estate Fund among 
232,
232,
203
and 
142
Real Estate
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to provide long-term growth through a combination of capital appreciation and current income.
		
Average Annual Total Returns 2



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					-2.60%
				
			

				
					-2.60%
				
			


3 Years

				
					7.23%
				
			

				
					7.23%
				
			


5 Years

				
					8.66%
				
			

				
					8.66%
				
			


10 Years

				
					5.37%
				
			

				
					5.37%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 9.80%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							9.80%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							October 31, 1997
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.74%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.74%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   								
			


				The Real Estate Fund charges a 1% 
redemption fee on shares held 90 days or less. 
The performance information shown does not reflect the deduction of the redemption fee; 
if it did, the performance would be lower.
			


2
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now




































404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                










































RealtyMogul.com™ | Real Estate Crowdfunding & Investing





Skip to main content








Real Estate Crowdfunding









Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 












Commercial Real Estate Investing for AllTM








                125,000 Investors
              

                Have joined RealtyMogul.com.
              

                Have joined Us.
              





                Over $285 Million
              

                Invested on our platform.
              

                Invested with us.
              





                $65 Million
              

                Paid out to RealtyMogul.com investors.
              

                Paid out to investors.
              





                $0 Principal Lost
              

                By RealtyMogul.com investors.
              

                By investors.
              






 



 















"Realty Mogul has so far raised more than $200 million to finance more than 330 properties since its launch in 2013."
  



"RealtyMogul.com's purpose is 'access through innovation' with investor protection and compliance as our guiding principles."
  



"... appeals to all skill levels, from first-timers to veteran investors. In just a few clicks, investors can access the best real estate deals."
  





 






How It Works


1. Invest
Invest in crowdfunded commercial real estate opportunities online for as little as $1000.


2. Relax
We collect returns generated from your investment and pay any expenses.


3. Get Paid
You reap the rewards when we distribute the income from your investments.


Get Started For FREENeed Financing? 








Investments on RealtyMogul.com are illiquid and loss of invested capital is possible. 
Please review risk factors for private placements here.
 







Recent Investments



 





        $3,510,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Retail
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Prunedale
        


  

 





        $1,010,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Industrial
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Indianapolis
        


  

 





        $1,240,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Multifamily
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Marietta
        


  

 





        $2,040,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Office
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Chicago
        


  

 





        $2,190,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Office
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            San Antonio
        


  

 





        $2,020,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Multifamily
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Oak Harbor
        


  

 





        $1,515,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Multifamily
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Fayetteville
        


  

 





        $710,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Office
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Hollywood
        


  

 





        $1,210,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Industrial
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Houston
        


  

 





        $1,525,000 Invested
    


            Property Type
        

            Office
        



            Investment Type
        

            Equity
        



            Location
        

            Rolling Meadows
        


  



























 
 








Become a Commercial Real Estate Investor Today
Join Now For FREE 



 



 
 




 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software


















































































Get Real Estate Financing | RealtyMogul.com





Skip to main content














Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 

 









Get Financing



How much are you looking to finance? 

 Debt or Equity?DebtEquity




 

 
 







Looking to Invest?
Start Here
 







Joint Venture Equity
$1MM - $5MM




Equity Contribution:
Up to 90% of equity


IRR:
13% +


Term:
1 - 10 years


Timing:
Close in 35 - 45 days


Structure:
Single consolidate entity: one K-1, one distribution, one report




Raise J.V. Equity for My Project
Learn More




Preferred Equity
$1MM - $5MM




Pref. Equity Contribution:
Up to 85% of cost


Rate:
11 - 13%


Term:
1 - 10 years


Timing:
Close in 35 - 45 days


Structure:
Single consolidate entity: one K-1, one distribution, one report




Raise Pref. Equity for My Project
Learn More




Commercial Bridge Loans
$1MM - $25MM




Loan to Cost:
Up to 85%


Loan to Value:
Up to 75%


Rate:
5 - 10%


Term:
12 - 36 Months


Timing:
Close in 35 - 45 days


Type:
Recourse and Non-Recourse




Finance My Commercial Project
Learn More




Mezzanine Debt
$1MM - $5MM




Mezzanine Contribution:
Up to 80%


Rate:
10 - 12%


Term:
1 - 10 years


Timing:
35 - 45 days




Finance My Commercial Project
Learn More


 




Looking to Invest?
Start Here 




More than $285 Million Financed to Date for 350+ Properties
 




Selected Transactions




$3,510,000
Equity Purchase
Prunedale, CA
Safeway & CVS Retail Center





$2,100,000
Commercial Loan
Bel Air, CA
5 Unit Multifamily




Finance My Next Project

 




Real Estate Lending Simplified.
Start Here 



Featured Articles




   
 RealtyMogul.com Named a Top Tech Company to Work For - Top Tech Company to Work For

In a recent Built in Los Angeles article...  

   
 News Recap: Largest Real Estate Loan Funded... - Largest Real Estate Loan Funded

Just in case you missed it, here’s a...  

   
 What Do Investors Need to Know About Crowdfunding?  - Crowdfunding

Featured in Bisnow.com

Crowdfunding platforms have...  

   
 RealtyMogul.com’s Newly Redesigned About Us Page  - About Us

If you’ve never read about how RealtyMogul.com came to be,...  

   
 CEO Jilliene Helman Featured on ABC15 Arizona - Jilliene Helman recently discussed her role as CEO and founder of...  

 

 
 

 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software












































































Register | RealtyMogul.com





Skip to main content














Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 

 









Invest



WelcomeGet started by creating your account below.Already have a RealtyMogul.com account? Log In Leave this field blank 


 This account is for *
  Investing 

  Raising Capital 





SMS Consent (Optional)By checking this box, you are consenting to participate in RealtyMogul.com's SMS Communications Program with the phone number entered above. By participating, you consent to receive text messages sent by an automatic telephone dialing system and acknowledge that data usage charges may apply by your cell phone company.Messages will include notifications regarding your RealtyMogul.com account, investment opportunity updates, and occasional special offers and promotions from RealtyMogul.com. These can be configured at any time in your user profile. First name *


 Last name *


 Phone *


 E-mail *


 Password *


 Acceptance of Terms *

I reviewed and agree to Terms of Service and Privacy Policy. *

 Communication Preferences 

I agree to receive SMS messages. (Optional)













 

 
 




 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software



















































































Register | RealtyMogul.com





Skip to main content














Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 

 









Invest



WelcomeGet started by creating your account below.Already have a RealtyMogul.com account? Log In Leave this field blank 


 This account is for *
  Investing 

  Raising Capital 





SMS Consent (Optional)By checking this box, you are consenting to participate in RealtyMogul.com's SMS Communications Program with the phone number entered above. By participating, you consent to receive text messages sent by an automatic telephone dialing system and acknowledge that data usage charges may apply by your cell phone company.Messages will include notifications regarding your RealtyMogul.com account, investment opportunity updates, and occasional special offers and promotions from RealtyMogul.com. These can be configured at any time in your user profile. First name *


 Last name *


 Phone *


 E-mail *


 Password *


 Acceptance of Terms *

I reviewed and agree to Terms of Service and Privacy Policy. *

 Communication Preferences 

I agree to receive SMS messages. (Optional)













 

 
 




 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software



















































































Register | RealtyMogul.com





Skip to main content














Better Business Bureau Rating: BBB Rating: A+



Call Us:  877.977.2776











Home
Invest
Resource Center
About Us
Login
Sign Up For FREE

For Real Estate Companies


Get Financing




 

 









Invest



WelcomeGet started by creating your account below.Already have a RealtyMogul.com account? Log In Leave this field blank 


 This account is for *
  Investing 

  Raising Capital 





SMS Consent (Optional)By checking this box, you are consenting to participate in RealtyMogul.com's SMS Communications Program with the phone number entered above. By participating, you consent to receive text messages sent by an automatic telephone dialing system and acknowledge that data usage charges may apply by your cell phone company.Messages will include notifications regarding your RealtyMogul.com account, investment opportunity updates, and occasional special offers and promotions from RealtyMogul.com. These can be configured at any time in your user profile. First name *


 Last name *


 Phone *


 E-mail *


 Password *


 Acceptance of Terms *

I reviewed and agree to Terms of Service and Privacy Policy. *

 Communication Preferences 

I agree to receive SMS messages. (Optional)













 

 
 




 

Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software






















































